Oklahoma, session 2026, SB80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1705, as
amended by Section 572, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (69 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1705), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1705. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is hereby
authorized and empowered:

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 1

(a) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and
conduct of its business.
(b) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure.
(c) To maintain an office at such place or places within the
state as it may designate.
(d) To sue and be sued in contract, reverse condemnation,
equity, mandamus, and similar actions in its own name, plead and be
impleaded; provided, that any and all actions at law or in equity
against the Authority shall be brought in the county in which the
principal office of the Authority shall be located, or in the county
of the residence of the plaintiff, or the county where the cause of
action arose. All privileges granted to the Authority and duties
enjoined upon the Authority by the provisions of Sections 1701
through 1734 1736 of this title may be enforced in a court of
competent jurisdiction in an action in mandamus.
(e) To construct, maintain, repair, and operate turnpike
projects and highways, with their access and connecting roads, at
such locations and on such routes as it shall determine to be
feasible and economically sound; provided, that until specifically
authorized by the Legislature, the Authority shall be authorized to
construct and operate toll turnpikes only at the following
locations:
(1) The Turner Turnpike between Oklahoma City and Tulsa.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 2

(2) The Southwestern (H.E. Bailey) Turnpike between Oklahoma
City and Wichita Falls, Texas.
(3) The Northeastern (Will Rogers) Turnpike between Tulsa and
Joplin, Missouri.
(4) The Eastern (Indian Nation) Turnpike between Tulsa
Henryetta and Paris, Texas, including all or any part thereof
between McAlester and the Red River south of Hugo.
(5) The Cimarron Turnpike between Tulsa and Interstate Highway
35 north of Perry, including a connection to Stillwater.
(6) The Muskogee Turnpike between Broken Arrow and Interstate
Highway 40 west of Webbers Falls.
(7) All or any part of an extension of the Muskogee Turnpike,
beginning at a point on Interstate Highway 40 near the present south
terminus of the Muskogee Turnpike, and extending in a southeasterly
direction on an alignment near Stigler, Poteau and Heavener to the
vicinity of the Arkansas State Line to furnish access to Hot
Springs, Texarkana, Shreveport and New Orleans.
(8) A tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in the vicinity of
Luther, Oklahoma, and in the vicinity of the intersection of State
Highway 33 and Turner Turnpike in Creek County, Oklahoma, or in the
vicinity of the intersection of State Highway 33 and Turner Turnpike
or U.S. Highway 66 in Creek County, Oklahoma, from any monies
available to the Authority.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 3

(9) Add on the Will Rogers Turnpike a northbound automatic
tollgate onto State Highway 28 and a southbound on-ramp from State
Highway 28.
(10) A turnpike (Chickasaw Turnpike) or any part or parts
thereof beginning in the vicinity of Duncan extending east to the
vicinity of the City of Davis, and extending in a northeasterly
direction, by way of to the vicinity of the City of Ada, to a
connection in the vicinity of Henryetta or in the vicinity of the
intersection of State Highway 48 and Interstate 40; and a turnpike
or any part or parts thereof from the vicinity of Snyder extending
north to the vicinity of Woodward.
(11) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning at a
point in the vicinity of Ponca City, or at a point on the Kansas-
Oklahoma state boundary line east of the Arkansas River and west of
the point where Oklahoma State Highway No. 18 intersects said state
boundary line, and extending in a southeasterly direction to a
connection with the Tulsa Urban Expressway System in the general
area of the Port of Catoosa.
(12) All or any part of an Oklahoma City toll expressway system
connecting the residential, industrial and State Capitol Complex in
the north part of Oklahoma City with the residential, industrial and
Will Rogers World Airport Complex in the south and southwest parts
of Oklahoma City.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 4

(13) A turnpike (The Industrial Parkway) or any part or parts
thereof beginning at a point on the Oklahoma-Kansas state boundary
line between the point where U.S. Highway 66 intersects the boundary
line and the northeast corner of Oklahoma and ending by means of a
connection or connections with Shreveport, Louisiana, and Houston,
Texas, in southeastern Oklahoma and at no point to exceed thirty
(30) miles west of the Missouri or Arkansas border.
(14) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the
vicinity of Velma or County Line to a point intersecting with
Interstate 35 in the area south of Davis.
(15) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the
vicinity of Watonga and extending south and/or east to the vicinity
of north and/or west Oklahoma City.
(16) A tollgate on the Will Rogers Turnpike near the
intersection of State Highway 137 and the Will Rogers Turnpike,
located south of Quapaw.
(17) A tollgate on the Muskogee Turnpike in the vicinity of
Porter, Oklahoma, a tollgate on the Will Rogers Turnpike in the
vicinity of Adair, Oklahoma, a tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in
the vicinity of Luther, Oklahoma, and a tollgate on the H.E. Bailey
Turnpike at Elgin, Oklahoma, from any monies available to the
Authority.
(18) A tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in the vicinity of
Wellston, Oklahoma, from any monies available to the Authority.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 5

(19) A tollgate on the Muskogee Turnpike in the vicinity of
Brushy Mountain, Oklahoma, and in the vicinity of Elm Grove,
Oklahoma, from any monies available to the Authority.
(20) (8) All or any part of an Oklahoma City Outer Loop
expressway system beginning in the vicinity of I-35 Interstate 35
and the Turner Turnpike and extending west into Canadian County and
then south to I-40 Interstate 40; and then south and east to I-35
Interstate 35 in the vicinity of Moore and Norman; and then
extending east and north to I-40 Interstate 40 east of Tinker Field;
and then extending north to the Turner Turnpike to complete the
Outer Loop.
(21) (9) All or any part of the Tulsa south bypass expressway
system (Creek Turnpike) beginning in the vicinity of the Turner
Turnpike near Sapulpa and extending south and east to U.S. Highway
75 in the vicinity of 96th Street to 121st Street; and then east
across the Arkansas River to a connection with the Mingo Valley
Expressway; and then south and/or or east to a point on the Tulsa-
Wagoner County Line county line near 131st Street south in the city
City of Broken Arrow.
(22) (10) A new turnpike (Creek Turnpike) or any part thereof
from near the west gate of the Will Rogers Turnpike south to the
west end of south Tulsa Turnpike at the Tulsa-Wagoner County Line
county line.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 6

(23) (11) A new turnpike (Cherokee Turnpike) or any parts
thereof from the vicinity of the connection between State U.S.
Highway 33 412 and U.S. Highway 69 easterly to the Arkansas State
Line state line.
(24) A four-lane extension of the Muskogee Turnpike from
Interstate Highway 40 west of Webbers Falls to the Poteau vicinity.
(25) A new turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning at a
point in the vicinity of northwest Tulsa, and extending in a
northwesterly direction, by means of a connection or connections
with the cities of Pawhuska and Newkirk, to a point intersecting in
the vicinity of U.S. Highway No. 77 and the Kansas State Line.
(26) A full access interchange on the Indian Nation Turnpike
south of Interstate 40, in the vicinity of Henryetta, Oklahoma, and
in the vicinity of the proposed theme park, museum or an industrial
facility which qualifies for the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act,
from any monies available to the Authority.
(27) A new turnpike beginning at a point directly west of the
Arkansas line and four-laning Highway 70 from that point to the
farthest western reach of Highway 70 creating a southern route
through Oklahoma.
(28) (12) A new turnpike and bridge or any parts thereof from a
point in the vicinity of the city City of Mustang southerly across
the South Canadian River to the H.E. Bailey Turnpike in the vicinity
of the city City of Tuttle; and then easterly across the South
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 7

Cana dian River to a point in the vicinity of the city City of
Norman.
(29) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at a point
in the vicinity of the city of Altus and extending in a
northwesterly direction to a point in the vicinity of the city of
Sayre.
(30) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at a point
in the vicinity of the city of Enid and extending in a westerly
direction to a point in the vicinity of the city of Woodward.
(31) An on- and off-ramp or any parts thereof at Fletcher,
Oklahoma, in the vicinity of the Interstate 44 and State Highway 277
intersection. Any existing on- or off-ramp or any parts thereof in
the vicinity of Fletcher, Oklahoma, shall not be removed and shall
be maintained pursuant to Section 1701 et seq. of this title.
(32) (13) A new bridge crossing the Arkansas River between
South Delaware Avenue and Memorial Drive in Tulsa County in the
vicinity of the City of Bixby. This project shall commence upon a
determination by the Oklahoma Transportation Authority that such
bridge shall be self-sufficient at some point over a thirty-year
time period from the toll charges associated with the bridge
project.
(33) An exit ramp or any parts thereof from the eastbound lane
of the Turner Turnpike at 96th Street in Tulsa.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 8

(34) An on- and off-ramp or any parts thereof on the Cimarron
Turnpike in the vicinity of the northside of the Glencoe, Oklahoma,
municipal limits.
(35) (14) A new turnpike (Gilcrease Expressway) or any parts
thereof beginning at Interstate 44 at or near its intersection with
49th West Avenue, past State U.S. Highway 64/412, turning
northeasterly, crossing 41st West Avenue, and continuing eastward to
the L.L. Tisdale Expressway in Tulsa, Oklahoma.
The Authority shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation in the vicinity of an authorized turnpike project that
states that the Authority is seeking to commence project design on
the route. Such notice shall be published prior to seeking any
contract for the design of a new route of an authorized turnpike
project. Such notice shall be published for four (4) consecutive
weeks. The Authority shall also publish and maintain such notice on
its website for no less than four (4) consecutive weeks.
The Authority’s approval of any contract to undertake the design
of a new route of an authorized turnpike project shall take place in
an open and public meeting held in compliance with the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act. After such meeting, the Authority shall:
(A) Within ninety (90) days, submit a report
electronically to the Governor, the members of the
Legislature, and to the elected officials of any city
or county where the new route shall be located,
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 9

inclusive of conceptual project maps and preliminary
project details. Such report shall also be published
on the website of the Authority,
(B) Within one hundred twenty (120) days, schedule and
hold a formal public meeting to provide a description
of the new route and preliminary project details,
including the approximate location, scope of work, and
design elements.
(i) Notice of the public meeting shall be given
electronically by posting on the Authority’s
official website and by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county
where the new route, or a major part of it, is to
be located. The notice to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation shall be
published in four consecutive weekly issues of
the newspaper, with the first publication to be
at least thirty (30) days prior to the public
meeting date. In addition to such notices, the
Authority shall make a good-faith effort to
provide notice to all known property owners
within one-half (1/2) mile on each side of the
new route. The Authority shall use its
discretion in selecting the method to provide the
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 10

notice to property owners, considering the number
and types of property interests of such owners.
(ii) The public meeting shall be held at a convenient
location that is as near to the new route as
practical.
(iii) At the public meeting, any person may submit
oral or written statements and data about the new
route. Reasonable limits may be set upon the
time allowed for oral statements.
(iv) The Authority shall also collect public comments
through an online portal with links to the portal
shared at the public meeting and on the website
of the Authority. Such online portal shall be
open for use by the public thirty (30) days prior
to the public meeting,
(C) Within thirty (30) days of the public meeting, provide
an electronic report to the Governor, the Legislature,
and the Transportation Commission summarizing the oral
and written statements presented at the meeting, in
addition to any data received, including any economic
impact reports and support or opposition to a route
offered by cities and counties where the new route is
to be located, and

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 11

(D) If the location of a new route changes based on the
results of the public meeting provided for in division
(C) of this subparagraph, electronically report such
changes to the Governor, the Legislature, the
Transportation Commission, and to the elected
officials of cities and counties where the new route
will be located. Additional public meetings,
conducted in accordance with the provisions of
division (C) of this subparagraph, may be scheduled at
the Authority’s discretion.
Prior to the completion of the design of a new route of an
authorized turnpike project, the Authority shall electronically
submit to the Governor, the Legislature, and to the elected
officials of cities and counties where the new route will be
located, the independent approval of the Transportation Commission
as provided in Section 1701 of this title.
Legislative authorization for any new turnpike location enacted
after the effective date of this act, shall terminate five (5) years
after the effective date of the act authorizing such turnpike,
unless the Authority has, in an open and public meeting held in
compliance with the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, approved a contract
to commence project design.


ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 12

All access roads, interchanges, or lead roads connecting such
turnpikes with existing highways must be built by funds furnished by
the Authority.
The minimum and maximum wages for the construction of the roads,
highways and projects provided for in Sections 1701 through 1734
1736 of this title shall be in accordance with the schedules of
wages used or adopted by the Commission in construction of state
highways.
The Authority is hereby authorized to enter into contracts or
agreements with agencies and instrumentalities of other states or
the national government for construction, maintenance, and operation
of interstate turnpikes or highways.
The Authority is hereby required to construct and install
automatic tollgates on the Will Rogers Turnpike at State Highway No.
28 near Adair.
(f) To issue turnpike revenue bonds of the Authority, payable
solely from revenues, including the revenues accruing to the trust
fund created by Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this title, for
the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more
turnpike projects. Provided, that any bonds issued for the
construction of the proposed turnpike referred to in subparagraphs
(10) (7), (20) (8), (21) (9), and (22) (10) of paragraph (e) of this
section shall be issued as one issue for all four of the proposed

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 13

turn pikes and shall be financed, constructed and operated under one
bond indenture.
(g) To fix and revise from time to time tolls for the use of
any turnpike projects.
Any common carrier having authority at the time of opening any
turnpike project to operate upon a highway approximately paralleling
the turnpike project shall be granted without further showing
authority to operate over the turnpike project to all municipalities
which such carrier is serving at the time the turnpike project is
opened to traffic. But nothing herein shall be construed as
granting any new operation rights to any common carriers.
(h) To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property
in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties.
(i) To acquire in the name of the Authority by purchase or
otherwise on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may
deem proper, or by exercise of the right of condemnation in manner
hereinafter provided, such public or private lands, including public
parks, playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights
therein, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests,
as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of Sections
1701 through 1734 1736 of this title; provided, that all public or
private property damaged in carrying out the powers granted by
Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this title shall be restored or
repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 14

prac ticable and the owner of such property be compensated in
accordance with the provisions of Sections 1706 through 1708 of this
title.
(j) To designate, except as is provided for herein, the
location, and establish, limit, and control such points of ingress
to and egress from each turnpike project as may be necessary or
desirable in the judgment of the Authority to insure the proper
operation and maintenance of such project, and to prohibit entrance
to such project from any point or points not so designated.
(k) To make and enter into all contracts and agreements
necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the
execution of its powers, and to employ consulting engineers,
attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts,
superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as
may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;
provided, that all such expenses shall be payable solely from the
proceeds of turnpike revenue bonds issued under the provisions of
Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this title or from revenues;
provided, further, no attorney employed by the Authority, nor any
member of any law firm of which the attorney may be connected, shall
ever be paid any fee or compensation for any special or
extraordinary services.
(l) To receive and accept from any federal agency grants for or
in aid of the construction of any turnpike project, provided, the
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 15

acce ptance of such grants will not reduce the amount of federal aid
for the construction, repair, or maintenance of farm-to-market roads
and other highways and bridges in this state; and to receive and
accept aid or contributions from any source of either money,
property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and
applied only for the purposes for which such grants and
contributions may be made.
(m) To adopt such rules, and to do any and all things necessary
to comply with rules, regulations, or requirements of the Bureau of
Public Roads, Multistate Economic Development Regional Commission,
as defined in Sections 1151 through 1153, inclusive, of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, Ozarka Region Commission Federal Highway
Administration or any other federal agency administering any law
enacted by the Congress of the United States to aid or encourage the
construction of highways.
(n) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted in Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this
title. The design standards for all paving shall comply with the
design standards of the American Association of State Highway and
Transportation Officials as modified by the Oklahoma Department of
Transportation. All contracts for construction work on turnpike
projects shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, or bidders,
after notice by publication in a newspaper published in the county
where the work is to be done in two consecutive weekly issues of the
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 16

news paper. In all cases where more than eight (8) miles of
construction is let at the same time and is not an advertisement for
a surface-treatment-only project, such advertisement shall provide
for bids on sections of the turnpike not to exceed eight (8) miles.
If the project advertised is a surface-treatment-only project of
more than twenty (20) miles of road, the advertisement shall provide
for bids on sections of the road no longer than twenty (20) miles,
as well as bids on the project as a whole. Subject to the following
restrictions and limitations, the Authority shall, when contracting
for construction work, divide such work into paving projects, bridge
projects, including underpasses and overpasses, and earthmoving or
miscellaneous projects, according to the type of work to be done.
Each project shall be let under a separate contract or contracts and
no contract or project shall include more than one of such types of
construction work. Each contract for construction work shall
contain a provision that ninety percent (90%) of all labor employed
on the project shall be residents of Oklahoma. However, contracts
for bridges may include earthwork and structures for the approaches
thereto.
(o) To adopt such rules, and to do any and all things necessary
to comply with all applicable federal and state laws and permits
related to the design, construction, maintenance, and operation of
turnpike projects authorized by this section.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 17

(p) It shall be unlawful for any member, officer or employee of
the Authority to transact with the Authority, either directly or
indirectly, any business for profit of such member, officer, or
employee; and any person, firm, or corporation knowingly
participating therein shall be equally liable for violation of this
provision.
The term “business for profit” shall include, but not be limited
to, the acceptance or payment of any fee, commission, gift, or
consideration to such member, officer, or employee.
Violation of this provision shall constitute a Class D1 felony
offense punishable by incarceration as provided for in subsections B
through F of Section 20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a
fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more
than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such imprisonment
and fine.
(p) (q) In the event of a national emergency, the Authority,
subject to any vested rights or claims, may enter into contracts
with the federal government or any authorized agency thereof to
allow the federal government or agency thereof to use such turnpikes
partly or exclusively during the existence of such emergency,
provided, that the federal government agrees in such contract to
pay, during the term of such contract, an amount sufficient, when
added to any tolls collected, to meet all operating and maintenance
expenses, interest payments, and the minimum sinking fund and
ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 18

rese rve requirements of the trust agreement for the turnpike covered
by the contract.
(q) (r) All meetings of the Authority shall be open public
meetings, and all records shall be public records, except when
considering personnel or litigation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives









ENGR. S. B. NO. 80 Page 19